en: Bottle cap, bottle top, cap, top, bottle caps, bottle tops, caps, tops
ar: غطاء قارورة
bg: Капачка, капачка за бутилка, капачки
da: flaskekapsel, kapsel
de: Flaschenverschluss
et: pudelikork
fa: درب بطری
fr: Bouchon, bouchons, Bouchon de bouteille, bouchons de bouteilles, bouchons
hu: Kupak, borosdugó, dugó
hy: Շշի խցան
it: tappo di bottiglia
ja: ボトルキャップ
jv: tutup botol
ko: 병마개
nl: Dop, Doppen
nn: flaskekapsel
pl: Kapsel
pt: Cápsula de garrafa, cápsulas de garrafa, tampa de garrafa, tampas de garrafa, rolha, rolhas, rolha de garrafa, rolhas de garrafa, rolha de cortiça, rolhas de cortiça, rolha de plástico, rolhas de plástico, carica, caricas, cápsula de rosca, cápsulas de rosca
ru: бутылочная пробка
sv: kapsyl, kapsyler
uk: пляшковий корок
zh: 瓶蓋

en: crown cork, crown cap
ca: tap corona
de: Kronkorken
eo: kronfermilo
fi: kruunukorkki
ja: 王冠 (栓)
ko: 크라운 코르크
sv: kronkork
zh: 皇冠式瓶蓋

en: screw cap, screw top
da: skruelåg
de: Schraubverschluss, Schraubdeckel, Drehverschluss
fi: kierrekorkki
ja: スクリューキャップ
nn: skrukork
zh: 螺旋蓋

en: flip-top, swing-top, Quillfeldt stopper
ca: tap de palanca
da: patentprop
de: Bügelverschluss, Patentverschluss
eo: krampfermilo
fi: patenttikorkki
ja: フリップトップ
nb: patentkork
sv: patentkork, bygelkork
uk: кліп-кришка

en: Grinder cap
de: Gewürzmühle, Mühlenverschluss
es: Tapa molinillo
fr: Bouchon broyeur, bouchons broyeurs
it: Tappo macinino

en: Wine cork, wine bottle cork, wine corks, wine bottle corks
bg: Коркова тапа, Корк за вино
de: Weinkorken, Weinflaschenkorken, Naturkorken
fa: چوب‌پنبه شراب
fr: bouchon de bouteille de vin, bouchons de bouteilles de vin, bouchon de vin
hr: pluteni čep
it: tappo di sughero, tappo di vino, tappo di bottiglia di vino
nl: Wijnkurk, wijnkurken, Wijn kurk
pl: Korek do wina
sv: vinkork

en: Champagne cork
bg: Шампанска корк
da: champagneprop
de: Sektkorken, Champagnerkorken, Sektverschluss
el: Πώμα σαμπάνιας
es: Corcho de champán
fr: bouchon de Champagne
hu: Pezsgő dugó
it: tappo di champagne
nb: sjampanjekork
nl: Champagnestop
pl: Korek do szampana
pt: Tampa de champanhe
sv: champagnekork

en: Capsule, capsules
bg: Капсула, капсули
de: Kapsel, Kapseln
es: Cápsula, cápsulas
fr: Capsule, capsules
hu: Kapszula, kapszulák
it: Capsula, capsule
lt: Kapsulė, kapsulės
nl: Capsule, Kroonkurk, Kroonkurken
pl: Kapsułka, kapsułki
pt: Cápsula, cápsulas
ru: Капсула, капсулы
sv: kapsel, kapslar

en: Coffee capsule, coffee capsules
de: Kaffeekapsel, Kaffeekapseln
es: Cápsula de café, cápsulas de café
fr: Capsule de café, Capsules de café, capsules café, capsule café
hu: Kávékapszula, kávé kapszula, kávékapszulák, kávé kapszulák
it: Capsula di caffè, capsule di caffè
lt: Kavos kapsulė, kavos kapsulės
nl: Koffiecapsule, Koffiecapsules, Nespressocapsule, Nespresso-capsule
pl: Kapsułka do kawy
pt: Cápsula de café, cápsulas de café, cápsula de cafés, cápsulas de cafés

en: Nespresso-compatible capsules
bg: Кафе капсули съвместими с Nespresso
de: Nespresso-kompatible Kapseln
es: Cápsulas compatibles con Nespresso
fi: Nespresso-yhteensopivat kapselit
fr: Dosettes compatible Nespresso, Dosettes Nespresso, Capsules Nespresso
it: Capsule compatibili Nespresso
lt: Nespresso kapsulės
nl: Nespresso-compatibele Capsules, Nespresso
pt: Cápsulas compatíveis com Nespresso

en: Tassimo-compatible capsules, T-Disc capsules
de: Tassimo-kompatible Kapseln
es: Cápsulas compatibles con Tassimo, Cápsulas T-Disc
fr: Dosettes compatible Tassimo, Dosettes Tassimo, Capsules Tassimo, Dosettes T-Disc, Capsules T-Disc
it: Capsule compatibili Tassimo, Capsule T-Disc
lt: Tassimo kapsulės, T-Disc kapsulės
nl: Tassimo-compatibele Capsules, Tassimo

en: Dolce Gusto-compatible capsules, Dolce Gusto capsules
de: Dolce Gusto-kompatible Kapseln
es: Cápsulas compatibles con Dolce Gusto
fr: Dosettes Dolce Gusto, dosettes compatible Dolce Gusto
it: Capsule compatibili Dolce Gusto
lt: Dolce Gusto kapsulės
nl: Dolce Gusto-compatibele Capsules, Dolce Gusto

en: Tea capsules
ar: كبسولات شاي
az: Çay kapsulları
bg: Чайни капсули
bn: চা ক্যাপসুল
ca: Càpsules de te
cs: Čajové kapsle
da: Te kapsler
de: Tee-Kapsel, Tee-Kapseln
el: Κάψουλες τσαγιού
es: Cápsulas de té
et: Teekapslid
fa: کپسول های چای
fi: Teekapselit
fr: Capsules de thé
he: קפסולות תה
hi: चाय कैप्सूल
hr: Kapsule za čaj
hu: Tea kapszulák
id: Kapsul teh
it: Capsule di tè
ja: ティーカプセル
ko: 차 캡슐
lt: Arbatos kapsulės
lv: Tējas kapsulas
ms: Kapsul teh
nl: Theecapsules
no: Te-kapsler
pl: Kapsułki do herbaty
pt: Cápsulas de chá
ro: Capsule de ceai
ru: Чайные капсулы
sk: Čajové kapsuly
sl: Čajne kapsule
sq: Kapsula çaji
sr: Чајне капсуле
sv: Te kapslar
th: แคปซูลชา
tr: Çay kapsülleri
uk: Чайні капсули
vi: Viên nang trà
zh: 茶胶囊

en: coffee pad, coffee pads
de: Kaffeepad, Kaffeepads
fr: dosette de café, dosettes de café
nl: Koffiepad

en: Senseo-compatible coffee capsules
bg: Кафе капсули съвместими с Senseo
de: Senseo-kompatible Kapseln
es: Cápsulas de café compatibles con Senseo
fi: Senseo-yhteensopivat kahvikapselit
fr: Dosettes Senseo, Capsules Senseo, Cafés en dosettes compatible Senseo
hu: Senseo-kompatibilis kávékapszulák
it: Capsule di caffè compatibili Senseo
lt: Senseo kapsulės
nl: Senseo-compatibele koffiecapsules, Senseo-compatibele koffiecapsule, Senseo
pt: Cápsulas de café compatíveis com Senseo

en: Tea bag
bg: Чаена торбичка
da: Tepose, teposer
de: Teebeutel
es: Bolsa de té, bolsita de té
fr: Sachet de thé, sachets de thé, thé en sachet
it: bustina di tè, bustina di te, bustina
nl: Theezakje
sv: Tepåse, tepåsar

en: Eating utensils, utensils, eating utensil, utensil
bg: Прибори за хранене
de: Einwegbesteck, Essbesteck, Essensutensilien, Utensilien, Essensutensil, Utensil
fr: Ustensiles, ustensile, Baguettes / Couverts / Paille
hu: evőeszközök, evőeszköz
nl: Bestek
pt: Talheres, talher

en: Cutlery
ar: أدوات المائدة
az: Süfrə dəsti
bg: Съдове за хранене
bn: কাটলারি
ca: Coberteria
cs: Příbory
da: Bestik
de: Besteck
el: μαχαιροπίρουνα
es: Cubiertos
et: Söögiriistad
fa: کارد و چنگال
fi: Ruokailuvälineet
fr: Couverts, couvert
he: סכו"ם
hi: कटलरी
hr: Pribor za jelo
id: Alat makan
it: Posate, posata
ja: カトラリー
ko: 칼붙이
lt: Stalo įrankiai
lv: Galda piederumi
ms: Kutleri
pl: Sztućce
ro: Tacâmuri
ru: Столовые приборы
sk: Príbory
sl: Jedilni pribor
sq: Takëm
sr: Прибор за јело
sv: Bestick
th: ช้อนส้อม
tr: Çatal bıçak takımı
uk: Столові прибори
ur: کٹلری
vi: Dao kéo
zh: 餐具

en: Chopsticks
bg: Пръчици за хранене
da: Spisepinde
de: Essstäbchen
es: Palillos chinos
fr: Baguettes
hu: evőpálcikák, evőpálkcika
it: Bacchette cinesi
lt: Valgymo lazdelės
nl: Stokjes
pl: Pałeczki
pt: Pauzinhos chineses, palitinhos, hashi
ro: Bățuri de mâncat
ru: Палочки для еды
sv: Ätpinnar
tr: Yemek çubukları

en: Knife, knives
bg: Нож, ножове
da: Kniv, knive
de: Messer
fr: Couteau, couteaux
hr: nož
hu: kés, kések
it: coltello, coltelli, coltellino, coltellini
nl: Mes, messen
pl: Nóż, noże
pt: Faca, facas
sv: Kniv